Missouri, session 2026, SB1750.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.130, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
393.130 and 393.325, to read as follows:
393.130. 1. Every gas corporation, every electrical
corporation, every water corporation, and every sewer
corporation shall furnish and provide such service
instrumentalities and facilities as shall be safe and
adequate and in all respects just and reasonable. All
charges made or demanded by any such gas corporation,
electrical corporation, water corporation or sewer
corporation for gas, electricity, water, sewer or any
service rendered or to be rendered shall be just and
reasonable and not more than allowed by law or by order or
decision of the commission. Every unjust or unreasonable
charge made or demanded for gas, electricity, water, sewer
or any such service, or in connection therewith, or in
excess of that allowed by law or by order or decision of the
commission is prohibited.
2. No gas corporation, electrical corporation, water
corporation or sewer corporation shall directly or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1750 2
indirectly by any special rate, rebate, drawback or other
device or method, charge, demand, collect or receive from
any person or corporation a greater or less compensation for
gas, electricity, water, sewer or for any service rendered
or to be rendered or in connection therewith, except as
authorized in this chapter, than it charges, demands,
collects or receives from any other person or corporation
for doing a like and contemporaneous service with respect
thereto under the same or substantially similar
circumstances or conditions.
3. No gas corporation, electrical corporation, water
corporation or sewer corporation shall make or grant any
undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any person,
corporation or locality, or to any particular description of
service in any respect whatsoever, or subject any particular
person, corporation or locality or any particular
description of service to any undue or unreasonable
prejudice or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever.
4. Nothing in this section shall be taken to prohibit
a gas corporation, electrical corporation, water corporation
or sewer corporation from establishing a sliding scale for a
fixed period for the automatic adjustment of charges for
gas, electricity, water, sewer or any service rendered or to
be rendered and the dividends to be paid stockholders of
such gas corporation, electrical corporation, water
corporation or sewer corporation; provided, that the sliding
scale shall first have been filed with and approved by the
commission; but nothing in this subsection shall operate to
prevent the commission after the expiration of such fixed
period from fixing proper, just and reasonable rates and
charges to be made for service as authorized in sections
393.110 to 393.285.

SB 1750 3
5. No water corporation shall be permitted to charge
any municipality or fire protection district a rate for the
placing and providing of fire hydrants for distribution of
water for use in protecting life and property from the
hazards of fire within such municipality or fire protection
district. Nothing herein shall prevent such water
corporation from including the cost of placement and
maintenance of such fire hydrants in its cost basis in
determining a fair and reasonable rate to be charged for
water. Any such fee or rental charge being made for such
fire hydrants whether by contract or otherwise at the time
this act shall take effect may remain in effect for a period
of one hundred twenty days after this section shall take
effect.
6. In any home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county,
any deposits held by the city for any water or sewerage
services provided to a customer at any premises shall accrue
interest if the customer is current in payments for water
and sewerage services and if the city has held the deposit
for two or more years. Interest for each year, or part
thereof, shall accrue at the rate set for six month United
States treasury bills effective December thirty-first of the
preceding year. For any deposit held by the city on or
before the December thirty-first prior to August 28, 2002,
if that deposit is still held by the city on the December
thirty-first one year next following August 28, 2002,
interest accruing pursuant to this section from the
effective date shall be credited to the customer's
individual account, or paid to the customer, at the city's
discretion.

SB 1750 4
7. Each electrical corporation providing electric
service to more than two hundred fifty thousand customers
shall develop and submit to the commission schedules to
include in the electrical corporation's service tariff
applicable to customers who are reasonably projected to have
above an annual peak demand of [one hundred] fifty megawatts
or more. The schedules should reasonably ensure such
customers' rates will reflect the customers' representative
share of the costs incurred to serve the customers and
prevent other customer classes' rates from reflecting any
unjust or unreasonable costs arising from service to such
customers. Each electrical corporation providing electric
service to two hundred fifty thousand or fewer customers as
of January 1, 2025, shall develop and submit to the
commission such schedules applicable to customers who are
reasonably projected to have above an annual peak demand of
fifty megawatts or more. The commission may order
electrical corporations to submit similar tariffs to
reasonably ensure that the rates of customers who are
100 reasonably projected to have annual peak demands below the
101 above-referenced levels will reflect the customers'
102 representative share of the costs incurred to serve the
103 customers and prevent other customer classes' rates from
104 reflecting any unjust or unreasonable costs arising from
105 service to such customers.
393.325. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the Missouri public service
commission;
(2) "Electrical corporation", the same as defined in
section 386.020;

SB 1750 5
(3) "Large load facility", a facility that centralizes
an organization's information technology operations and
equipment for storing, managing, processing, and
transmitting data. A large load facility contains critical
information technology infrastructure, including servers,
storage systems, and networking equipment supported by
electrical generation, cooling, and security systems;
(4) "Public utility", the same as defined in section
386.020;
(5) "Study costs", a financial analysis, feasibility,
and estimation expenses projected to be incurred from
planning, constructing, operating, or upgrading a large load
facility.
2. An owner or operator of a large load facility with
an intent to operate the facility in the state after August
28, 2026, shall file a disclosure of intent to operate with
the commission before signing any binding contract with any
public utility. Such disclosure shall include at a minimum:
(1) Intent to operate;
(2) Geographical location of operation; and
(3) Facility specifics as applicable:
(a) Predicted energy needs of operation and strategies
for effectiveness of use;
(b) Projected water usage estimates and strategies for
effectiveness of use;
(c) Projected total harmonic distortion measurements;
(d) Airflow management plan;
(e) Cooling system type and plan;
(f) Plans for expansion of site; and
(g) Plans for onsite power generation.
3. During the review process of the disclosure under
subsection 2 of this section, the commission shall take into

SB 1750 6
account the availability of local, state, and regional
resources, including the current availability of electric
generation, distribution, and transmission infrastructure to
operate a large load facility without putting an electric
burden on other customers connected to the same electric
grid as the proposed large load facility. The commission
shall make the disclosure publicly accessible on the
commission's website. The commission shall require an owner
or operator to include the following in the disclosure:
(1) Provide baseline measurements of the proposed site
to identify any existing issues with building a large load
facility before the site is developed;
(2) Provide power generation specifics that the large
load facility plans to have on site;
(3) Sign an affidavit that the large load facility
shall enter into a contract with a public utility; and
(4) Show that a large load facility shall have a
minimum contract term of twenty years with an electrical
corporation and a five-year period of termination with a
five-year disconnection notice.
4. The commission shall have the authority to approve,
provisionally approve with the description of metrics needed
for full approval, or deny the disclosure if the large load
facility fails to meet the state and regional generation,
distribution, or transmission infrastructure requirements.
5. Upon approval of the disclosure under subsection 2
of this section, an owner or operator of a large load
facility shall conduct a preconstruction study of the large
load facility and submit the results of the study to the
commission. The study shall include, but not be limited to,
the following:
(1) The use of cooling systems;

SB 1750 7
(2) Power distribution;
(3) Hardware efficiency;
(4) Airflow management;
(5) Modular design for expansion, if necessary;
(6) Onsite power generation plan, if applicable;
(7) Water usage effectiveness, including but not
limited to:
(a) Preconstruction water usage;
(b) Preconstruction water availability;
(c) Historical and projected weather patterns;
(d) Water demand for a data center and demand for the
customers in the area who may be impacted;
(e) Potential water shortfall plan;
(f) Onsite water treatment plan, if applicable; and
(g) The use of water on cooling systems, if applicable;
(8) Any feedback from the department of natural
resources and relevant soil and water conservation district,
if any, on the large load facility's water use and the
impact on local communities; and
(9) Harmonic distortion measurements not to exceed
fifty decibels between the hours of 9 a.m. to 9 p.m. and
forty-five decibels between the hours of 9 p.m. to 9 a.m.
The study under this subsection shall be conducted for the
second time after the construction of the large load
facility is completed to ensure no deficiencies are present
and whether mitigation is necessary. If the
postconstruction study shows any deficiencies or
disparities, the owner or operator shall pay for any
mitigation expenses. Results of the pre and
100 postconstruction studies shall be reported to the commission
101 and shall be made available to the public before and after

SB 1750 8
102 construction is completed and annually thereafter in a
103 format determined by the commission.
104 6. After the disclosure under subsection 2 of this
105 section is approved by the commission, an owner or operator
106 of the large load facility shall be required to:
107 (1) Deposit and maintain in a financial institution
108 authorized to do business in the state a sum equal to the
109 total cost of twenty-four months of minimum monthly payments
110 for electric consumption by the large load facility;
111 (2) Provide collateral equal to five years of minimum
112 monthly bills;
113 (3) Pay for the large load facility's electric
114 capacity, including that in the event the large load
115 facility's electric consumption falls below ninety percent,
116 the large load facility shall continue as if the facility is
117 operating at capacity;
118 (4) Cover the costs of transmission network upgrades
119 as necessary;
120 (5) Cover the costs of capital expenditure for any
121 needed infrastructure for generation, distribution, or
122 transmission network upgrades to make such facility
123 operational; and
124 (6) Cover the cost of capital expenditure and
125 maintenance costs of the facility to prevent the degradation
126 of power quality, water quality, and the reduction of
127 harmonic distortion.
128 Costs under subdivisions (4), (5), and (6) of this
129 subsection shall not be shifted to any other class of
130 ratepayers in a general rate proceeding.
131 7. After a large load facility becomes operational, an
132 owner or operator of the facility shall contribute to a

SB 1750 9
133 statewide organization aimed at supporting nonprofit
134 organizations operating the federal Low Income Home Energy
135 Assistance Program or the Missouri low-income weatherization
136 assistance program or to the Utilicare plan pursuant to
137 sections 660.100 to 660.136 annually, as follows:
138 (a) A large load facility that consumes between zero
139 to twenty-five megawatts of electricity shall pay two
140 hundred fifty thousand dollars;
141 (b) A large load facility that consumes between twenty-
142 five to fifty megawatts of electricity shall pay five
143 hundred thousand dollars; or
144 (c) A large load facility that consumes more than
145 fifty megawatts of electricity shall pay one million dollars.
146 8. (1) Any large load facility with a peak electrical
147 demand of greater than twenty-five megawatts shall implement
148 an emergency curtailment system for temporary reduction or
149 suspension of electric usage. Such system shall allow an
150 electrical corporation that provides electricity to the
151 facility to temporarily reduce or suspend electric service
152 during firm load emergencies including, but not limited to,
153 low operating energy reserves or rotating electrical outages.
154 (2) A Large load facility under this subsection may
155 switch to backup generation that is self-supported during
156 firm load emergency curtailment procedures.
157 (3) A large load facility under this subsection shall
158 submit annual energy consumption data and emergency
159 curtailment plans to the commission and such plans shall be
160 made available by the commission on the commission's website
161 to the public.
162 (4) A large load facility under this subsection that
163 provides services to entities that provide critical services
164 including, but not limited to, hospitals, long-term care

SB 1750 10
165 facilities, or first-responder facilities shall be exempted
166 from the provisions of this subsection.
167 9. A large load facility shall not get a refund
168 relating to any capacity adjustment. Such refund shall be
169 processed through a fuel adjustment clause.
170 10. An owner or operator of a large load facility
171 shall be required to pay for the facility's interconnection
172 and study costs. Such costs shall not be shifted to
173 ratepayers in a general rate proceeding.
174 11. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement
175 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
176 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
177 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
178 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
179 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
180 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
181 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
182 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
183 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
184 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
185 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
186 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓